Washington statutes.
RCW 19.98.020

Repurchase payments—Liens and claims.

All repurchase payments to dealers made pursuant to RCW 19.98.010 shall be less amounts owed on any lien or claim then outstanding upon such items covered by this section. Any supplier making repurchase payments covered by this chapter to any dealer shall satisfy such secured liens or claims pursuant to Article 62A.9A RCW less any interest owed to the lienholder arising from the financing of such items which shall be paid to any such secured lienholder by the dealer. In no case shall the supplier, in making payments covered by RCW 19.98.010, pay in excess of those amounts prescribed therein.

[ 2002 c 236 s 3; 2000 c 171 s 66; 1975 1st ex.s. c 277 s 2.]